North Dakota, session 69, SB2381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 39-06-49 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
39-06-49. Fees - Deposit in state highway fund.
1. All money received under this chapter must be paid monthly into the highway fund in
the state treasury.
2. The fee for:
a. An application for a nondriver photo identification card is eighttwenty dollars.
b. Written testing for an application for an operator's license is fiveten dollars.
c. Initial, class change, and renewal permits is thirty dollars.
d. Online written testing for an application for an operator's license is ten dollars.
d.e. Actual ability testing for an application for ana noncommercial operator's license
is fiveten dollars, and a commercial operator's license is ten dollars.
e.f. An application for ana noncommercial operator's license is fifteenthirty dollars
and a commercial operator's license is thirty dollars.
f.g. An application for a motorized bicycle operator's permit is ten dollars.
Page No. 1 25.1344.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
g.h A substitute nondriver identification card or operator's license is eightsixteen
dollars unless the substitute is for erroneous information due to a change in
name or address, then the fee is threesix dollars.
h.i. AnA noncommerical operator's license renewal is fifteenthirty dollars and a
commercial operator's license renewal is thirty dollars.
i.j. A nonresident commercial driver's license is forty dollars.
k. Reinstatement after suspension is fifty one hundred dollars unless the suspension
was the result of a suspension under subsection 3, 4, or 6 of section 39-06-03 or
subsection 2 of section 39-06-32, then the fee is twenty-five dollars, or unless the
suspension was a result of a violation under section 39-08-01 or chapter 39-20,
then the fee is one hundred two hundred dollars.
j.l. Reinstatement after revocation is fifty one hundred dollars, unless the revocation
was imposed for a violation of subsection 6 of section 39-06-17 or section
39-06-31, 39-06-43, or 39-20-04, then the fee is one hundred two hundred dollars.
m. A commercial license endorsement is six dollars for each endorsement.
n. The driving record for an employer of a commercial license holder is six dollars .
o. Operating record abstracts, records of clearance, or other record data are
six dollars per record .
3. Any application for which there is a fee must be accompanied by the proper fee.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 39-06.2-07 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. An individual may not be issued a commercial driver's license unless that individual is
a resident of this state; has passed a knowledge and skills test that may include a
skills test or knowledge test administered by another state or skills test or knowledge
test results electronically submitted by another state, for driving a commercial motor
vehicle which complies with minimum federal standards established by federal
regulations enumerated in 49 CFR part 383, subparts G and H; and has satisfied all
other requirements of state and federal law, including the Commercial Motor Vehicle
Safety Act. The tests must be prescribed and conducted by the director. The applicant
shall pay the fee listed in section 39-06.2-19 39 - 06 - 49 for each of the tests.
Page No. 2 25.1344.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 39-06.2-08 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. The application must be accompanied by an application fee listed in section
39-06.2-19 39 - 06 - 49 . The application must contain any other information as the
director may require to improve identity security. The director shall require an applicant
for a commercial license or commercial learner's permit to provide documentary
evidence that confirms to the satisfaction of the director the true identity, date of birth,
and legal presence of the applicant and provide a social security card or other
satisfactory evidence of a social security number and proof of residence address, if not
previously provided or if there are changes to the information already on file.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Subdivision c of subsection 3 of section 39-06.2-09 of the
North Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
c. Other restrictions may be placed upon a commercial driver's license, under
section 39-06-17. The applicant shall pay a fee listed in section
39-06.2-19 39 - 06 - 49 for each endorsement.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 39-06.2-09.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
39-06.2-09.1. Nondomiciled commercial license.
1. The department may issue a nondomiciled commercial driver's license to an applicant
who does not present a social security card as required by section 39-06.2-08 but who
otherwise meets the requirements for a nondomiciled commercial driver's license. A
license issued under this subsection is valid only during the period of time of the
applicant's authorized stay in the United States. The license may be renewed only
upon presentation of valid documentary evidence that the status has been extended.
The department shall renew without a skills or knowledge test a nondomiciled
commercial license that has been expired for a duration not longer than one year.
2. The fee for a nondomiciled commercial driver's license is listed in section
39-06.2-19 39 - 06 - 49 .
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 39-06.2-13.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 3 25.1344.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
39-06.2-13.1. Driving record information to be provided.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law and upon payment of a fee listed in section
39-06.2-19 39 - 06 - 49 , the director shall provide full information regarding the driving record of an
individual who has been issued a commercial driver's license to an employer or to a prospective
employer if the individual has given written consent to the prospective employer for this
information.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 39-06.2-19 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
39-06.2-19. Fees - Deposit in highway fund.
1. All money received under this chapter must be paid monthly to the highway fund in the
state treasury.
2. The fee for:
a. A commercial driver's license test is five dollars.
b. An application for a commercial driver's license or permit is fifteen dollars.
c. Each endorsement is three dollars.
d. A nonresident commercial driver's license is twenty dollars.
e. The driving record for an employer or prospective employer is three dollars Fees
must be assessed in accordance with section 39 - 06 - 49 .
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 39-16-03 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. AThe fee of three dollars listed under section 39 - 06 - 49 must be paid for each abstract
of any operating record, operating record, complete operating record, or record of
clearance. A reasonable fee must be paid for each source document. The director may
not assess a fee to a law enforcement agency, a judicial officer, or another licensing
jurisdiction. The director shall send an additional copy of the abstract, source
document if requested in aggregate form, or record of clearance to the driver whose
record was requested, accompanied by a statement identifying the person making the
request, identifying the person for whom or which the request is made, identifying the
intended recipient of the record, and providing the reason for the request. An
additional copy of the abstract or record of clearance may not be sent to a driver if the
request for the record was made by the federal bureau of investigation or the United
Page No. 4 25.1344.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
States central intelligence agency, or agents, or by any law enforcement agency or
judicial officer.
Page No. 5 25.1344.02000